dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX BJ Y 13
SFX BJ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BJ e o/xPxBxO .
SFX BJ e i/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 te/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 ta/xPxE .
SFX BJ e ij/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 ti/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 tu/xPxE .
SFX BJ e ah/xPxE .
SFX BJ e am/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 tem/xPxE .
SFX BJ 0 tom/xPxE .
SFX BJ e ami/xPxE .

SFX BK Y 10
SFX BK 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX BK 0 i/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 em/xPxE .
SFX BK 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX BL Y 11
SFX BL 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BL 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX BL n 0 .
SFX BL 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BL in ov/xPxE .
SFX BL 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BL in ah/xPxE .
SFX BL in am/xPxE .
SFX BL 0 om/xPxE .
SFX BL in ami/xPxE .
SFX BL 0 e/xPxE .

SFX BM Y 4
SFX BM to ego .
SFX BM to em .
SFX BM to emu .
SFX BM to im .

SFX BN Y 80
SFX BN ti l .
SFX BN ti la .
SFX BN ti lo .
SFX BN ti li .
SFX BN ti m .
SFX BN ti š .
SFX BN ti 0 .
SFX BN ti mo .
SFX BN i e .
SFX BN ti dut .
SFX BN ti h .
SFX BN ti še .
SFX BN ti hmo .
SFX BN ti ste .
SFX BN ti hu .
SFX BN ti j .
SFX BN ti jmo .
SFX BN ti jte .
SFX BN ti duči .
SFX BN ti dučego .
SFX BN ti dučemu .
SFX BN ti dučim .
SFX BN ti dučem .
SFX BN ti dučih .
SFX BN ti dučimi .
SFX BN ti duča .
SFX BN ti duču .
SFX BN ti dučej .
SFX BN ti dučeju .
SFX BN ti duče .
SFX BN ti domy .
SFX BN ti domogo .
SFX BN ti domomu .
SFX BN ti domym .
SFX BN ti domom .
SFX BN ti domo .
SFX BN ti doma .
SFX BN ti domu .
SFX BN ti domoj .
SFX BN ti domoju .
SFX BN ti domi .
SFX BN ti dome .
SFX BN ti domyh .
SFX BN ti domym .
SFX BN ti domymi .
SFX BN ti domo .
SFX BN ti vši .
SFX BN ti všego .
SFX BN ti všemu .
SFX BN ti všim .
SFX BN ti všem .
SFX BN ti vših .
SFX BN ti všimi .
SFX BN ti vša .
SFX BN ti všu .
SFX BN ti všej .
SFX BN ti všeju .
SFX BN ti vše .
SFX BN ti ny .
SFX BN ti nogo .
SFX BN ti nomu .
SFX BN ti nym .
SFX BN ti nom .
SFX BN ti ni .
SFX BN ti ne .
SFX BN ti nyh .
SFX BN ti nymi .
SFX BN ti na .
SFX BN ti nu .
SFX BN ti noj .
SFX BN ti noju .
SFX BN ti no .
SFX BN ti nje/xPxE .
SFX BN ti nja/xPxE .
SFX BN ti nju/xPxE .
SFX BN ti njem/xPxE .
SFX BN ti nij/xPxE .
SFX BN ti njam/xPxE .
SFX BN ti njami/xPxE .
SFX BN ti njah/xPxE .

SFX BO Y 4
SFX BO to-nebud ogo-nebud .
SFX BO to-nebud om-nebud .
SFX BO to-nebud omu-nebud .
SFX BO to-nebud ym-nebud .

SFX BP Y 80
SFX BP ti l .
SFX BP ti la .
SFX BP ti lo .
SFX BP ti li .
SFX BP zati žu .
SFX BP zati žem .
SFX BP zati žeš .
SFX BP zati že .
SFX BP zati žemo .
SFX BP zati žete .
SFX BP zati žut .
SFX BP ti h .
SFX BP ti še .
SFX BP ti hmo .
SFX BP ti ste .
SFX BP ti hu .
SFX BP zati ži .
SFX BP zati žimo .
SFX BP zati žite .
SFX BP zati žuči .
SFX BP zati žučego .
SFX BP zati žučemu .
SFX BP zati žučim .
SFX BP zati žučem .
SFX BP zati žučih .
SFX BP zati žučimi .
SFX BP zati žuča .
SFX BP zati žuču .
SFX BP zati žučej .
SFX BP zati žučeju .
SFX BP zati žuče .
SFX BP zati žemy .
SFX BP zati žemogo .
SFX BP zati žemomu .
SFX BP zati žemym .
SFX BP zati žemom .
SFX BP zati žemo .
SFX BP zati žema .
SFX BP zati žemu .
SFX BP zati žemoj .
SFX BP zati žemoju .
SFX BP zati žemi .
SFX BP zati žeme .
SFX BP zati žemyh .
SFX BP zati žemym .
SFX BP zati žemymi .
SFX BP ti vši .
SFX BP ti všego .
SFX BP ti všemu .
SFX BP ti všim .
SFX BP ti všem .
SFX BP ti vših .
SFX BP ti všimi .
SFX BP ti vša .
SFX BP ti všu .
SFX BP ti všej .
SFX BP ti všeju .
SFX BP ti vše .
SFX BP ti ny .
SFX BP ti nogo .
SFX BP ti nomu .
SFX BP ti nym .
SFX BP ti nom .
SFX BP ti ni .
SFX BP ti ne .
SFX BP ti nyh .
SFX BP ti nymi .
SFX BP ti na .
SFX BP ti nu .
SFX BP ti noj .
SFX BP ti noju .
SFX BP ti no .
SFX BP ti nje/xPxE .
SFX BP ti nja/xPxE .
SFX BP ti nju/xPxE .
SFX BP ti njem/xPxE .
SFX BP ti nij/xPxE .
SFX BP ti njam/xPxE .
SFX BP ti njami/xPxE .
SFX BP ti njah/xPxE .

SFX BQ Y 4
SFX BQ obě ebe .
SFX BQ obě e .
SFX BQ obě i .
SFX BQ ě oju .

SFX BR Y 4
SFX BR i ebe .
SFX BR i e .
SFX BR i obě .
SFX BR i oboju .

SFX BS Y 62
SFX BS ti l .
SFX BS ti la .
SFX BS ti lo .
SFX BS ti li .
SFX BS ti ju .
SFX BS ti jem .
SFX BS ti ješ .
SFX BS ti je .
SFX BS ti jemo .
SFX BS ti jete .
SFX BS ti jut .
SFX BS ti h .
SFX BS ti še .
SFX BS ti hmo .
SFX BS ti ste .
SFX BS ti hu .
SFX BS ti j .
SFX BS ti jmo .
SFX BS ti jte .
SFX BS ti juči .
SFX BS ti jučego .
SFX BS ti jučemu .
SFX BS ti jučim .
SFX BS ti jučem .
SFX BS ti jučih .
SFX BS ti jučimi .
SFX BS ti juča .
SFX BS ti juču .
SFX BS ti jučej .
SFX BS ti jučeju .
SFX BS ti juče .
SFX BS ti jemy .
SFX BS ti jemogo .
SFX BS ti jemomu .
SFX BS ti jemym .
SFX BS ti jemom .
SFX BS ti jemo .
SFX BS ti jema .
SFX BS ti jemu .
SFX BS ti jemoj .
SFX BS ti jemoju .
SFX BS ti jemi .
SFX BS ti jeme .
SFX BS ti jemyh .
SFX BS ti jemym .
SFX BS ti jemymi .
SFX BS ti vši .
SFX BS ti všego .
SFX BS ti všemu .
SFX BS ti všim .
SFX BS ti všem .
SFX BS ti vših .
SFX BS ti všimi .
SFX BS ti vša .
SFX BS ti všu .
SFX BS ti všej .
SFX BS ti všeju .
SFX BS ti vše .
SFX BS i y .
SFX BS i a .
SFX BS i o .
SFX BS i je .

SFX BT Y 11
SFX BT 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX BT 0 y/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 om/xPxE .
SFX BT 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX BT k če/xPxE .

SFX BU Y 18
SFX BU 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX BU j 0 .
SFX BU j i/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 e/xPxE .
SFX BU j e/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BU j ev/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BU j ah/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BU j am/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BU j em/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 em/xPxE .
SFX BU j ami/xPxE .
SFX BU 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX BV Y 19
SFX BV 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX BV ot t/xPxE .
SFX BV ot te/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 e/xPxE .
SFX BV ot ta/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BV ot tev/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX BV ot tu/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BV ot tah/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BV ot tam/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BV ot tem/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 em/xPxE .
SFX BV ot tami/xPxE .
SFX BV 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX BW Y 26
SFX BW 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BW i e/xPxE .
SFX BW i a/xPxE .
SFX BW i ego/xBxPxE .
SFX BW i u/xPxE .
SFX BW i ej/xPxE .
SFX BW i em/xPxE .
SFX BW i emu/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 m/xPxE .
SFX BW i eju/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 h/xPxE .
SFX BW 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX BW i ejši/zz .
SFX BW i ejšego/zz .
SFX BW i ejšemu/zz .
SFX BW i ejšim/zz .
SFX BW i ejšem/zz .
SFX BW i ejše/zz .
SFX BW i ejša/zz .
SFX BW i ejšu/zz .
SFX BW i ejšej/zz .
SFX BW i ejšeju/zz .
SFX BW i ejših/zz .
SFX BW i ejšim/zz .
SFX BW i ejšimi/zz .
SFX BW i eje/zz .

SFX BX Y 68
SFX BX ti l .
SFX BX ti la .
SFX BX ti lo .
SFX BX ti li .
SFX BX ěti ju .
SFX BX ěti im .
SFX BX ěti iš .
SFX BX ěti i .
SFX BX ěti imo .
SFX BX ěti ite .
SFX BX ěti et .
SFX BX ti h .
SFX BX ti še .
SFX BX ti hmo .
SFX BX ti ste .
SFX BX ti hu .
SFX BX ěti eči .
SFX BX ěti eča .
SFX BX ěti eče .
SFX BX ěti imy .
SFX BX ěti imogo .
SFX BX ěti imomu .
SFX BX ěti imym .
SFX BX ěti imom .
SFX BX ěti imo .
SFX BX ěti ima .
SFX BX ěti imu .
SFX BX ěti imoj .
SFX BX ěti imoju .
SFX BX ěti imi .
SFX BX ěti ime .
SFX BX ěti imyh .
SFX BX ěti imym .
SFX BX ěti imymi .
SFX BX ti vši .
SFX BX ti všego .
SFX BX ti všemu .
SFX BX ti všim .
SFX BX ti všem .
SFX BX ti vših .
SFX BX ti všimi .
SFX BX ti vša .
SFX BX ti všu .
SFX BX ti všej .
SFX BX ti všeju .
SFX BX ti vše .
SFX BX ti ny .
SFX BX ti nogo .
SFX BX ti nomu .
SFX BX ti nym .
SFX BX ti nom .
SFX BX ti ni .
SFX BX ti ne .
SFX BX ti nyh .
SFX BX ti nymi .
SFX BX ti na .
SFX BX ti nu .
SFX BX ti noj .
SFX BX ti noju .
SFX BX ti no .
SFX BX ti nje/xPxE .
SFX BX ti nja/xPxE .
SFX BX ti nju/xPxE .
SFX BX ti njem/xPxE .
SFX BX ti nij/xPxE .
SFX BX ti njam/xPxE .
SFX BX ti njami/xPxE .
SFX BX ti njah/xPxE .

SFX BY Y 11
SFX BY 0 0/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX BY 0 y/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 a/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 u/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 am/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 om/xPxE .
SFX BY 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX BY h še/xPxE .
