dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
děte/BJ
hristijanin/BL
inočto/BM
dodati/BN
kto-nebud/BO
lizati/BP
sobě/BQ
si/BR
liti/BS
črnogorjanin/BL
plamenj/BU
lakot/BV
los/BK
gorěti/BX
měh/BY
směh/BY
sinji/BW
jezyk/BT
pomněti/BX
čuti/BS
dati/BN
trpěti/BX
bok/BT
strah/BY
najgorši/BW
greměti/BX
zvuk/BT
krok/BT
komisar/BK
iměti/BS
muslimanin/BL
zvěr/BK
obči/BW
orěh/BY
oblak/BT
prědati/BN
děti/BS
nogot/BV
rys/BK
rizik/BT
razviti/BS
labed/BK
kamenj/BU
skazati/BP
slovjanin/BL
slědujuči/BW
mak/BT
okazati/BP
tvorčji/BW
ječmenj/BU
uspěh/BY
usměh/BY
vsečto/BM
grěh/BY
podzrěti/BX
myti/BS
gost/BK
grěti/BS
strajk/BT
vozduh/BY
pokazati/BP
grebenj/BU
zet/BK
mazati/BP
dateljnik/BT
kazati/BP
piti/BS
gorši/BW
pripomněti/BX
bolěti/BX
ubiti/BS
vugor/BK
časovnik/BT
jelenj/BU
prětrpěti/BX
medvěd/BK
prědšedši/BW
blok/BT
vezati/BP
grah/BY
karas/BK
gus/BK
izpiti/BS
kryti/BS
napomněti/BX
nastoječi/BW
lěkar/BK
prědskazati/BP
gradžanin/BL
korenj/BU
mněti/BX
daljši/BW
kremenj/BU
nakazati/BP
vrh/BY
seljanin/BL
ruh/BY
najlučši/BW
rězati/BP
ček/BT
kuhar/BK
svezati/BP
prah/BY
goreči/BW
razdati/BN
obvezati/BP
obliti/BS
utrpěti/BX
iztrpěti/BX
zrěti/BS
uzrěti/BX
biti/BS
pobiti/BS
ranši/BW
poddati/BN
věk/BT
krah/BY
grobar/BK
vozdyh/BY
prodati/BN
bibliotekar/BK
odrězati/BP
duži/BW
podliti/BS
glasnik/BT
odkazati/BP
čajnik/BT
izbuh/BY
izdati/BN
sumrak/BT
vozdati/BN
podati/BN
svěži/BW
prašek/BT
briti/BS
gniti/BS
oddati/BN
probiti/BS
zadati/BN
popiti/BS
upiti/BS
izgniti/BS
viti/BS
car/BK
izkonavči/BW
postrah/BY
najglubši/BW
pospěh/BY
vozpomněti/BX
imeniteljnik/BT
sluh/BY
sekretar/BK
proliti/BS
zapisnik/BT
člověčji/BW
podsekretar/BK
urězati/BP
indijanin/BL
neuspěh/BY
blizši/BW
děvičji/BW
dyh/BY
dokazati/BP
doždnik/BT
gadji/BW
hladnějši/BW
izrězati/BP
klik/BT
knez/BK
kominjar/BK
krasnějši/BW
cvětuči/BW
mladši/BW
najbogatši/BW
največši/BW
najkrasivši/BW
najkrvavši/BW
najmenši/BW
najpozdnějši/BW
najzimnějši/BW
prězrěti/BX
obrězati/BP
petikutnik/BT
povyši/BW
prěrězati/BP
prěsvezati/BP
puh/BY
razbiti/BS
razbolěti/BS
razvivajuči/BW
ravnoznačnik/BT
rybar/BK
rycar/BK
spomněti/BX
šestikutnik/BT
trbuh/BY
udivjajuči/BW
vladar/BK
zabolěti/BX
zabolěvši/BW
zakazati/BP
zapah/BY
želězničar/BK
barak/BT
lučši/BW
guslar/BK
oddyh/BY
vojevničji/BW
četyrokutnik/BT
notar/BK
žučji/BW
vtornik/BT
gusljar/BK
zvateljnik/BT
vytrpěti/BX
dvorjanin/BL
netopyr/BK
prědložnik/BT
nadati/BN
dnevnik/BT
duh/BY
imuči/BW
kožuh/BY
lancuh/BY
lgar/BK
najlegši/BW
oblizati/BP
prazdnik/BT
prostějši/BW
ručnik/BT
sliti/BS
šeršenj/BU
skrběti/BX
skripěti/BX
stih/BY
tyčkoskok/BT
vitez/BK
zavezati/BP
bezpokoječi/BW
čto/BM
něčto/BM
ničto/BM
početkujuči/BW
pozrěti/BX
prajezyk/BT
prikazati/BP
širši/BW
srbolužičanin/BL
ukazati/BP
vysši/BW
angličanin/BL
italijanin/BL
mah/BY
měščanin/BL
nabiti/BS
navezati/BP
odbiti/BS
razmah/BY
vsemoguči/BW
maljar/BK
mesar/BK
pastyr/BK
pekar/BK
poldnik/BT
poštar/BK
zeleninar/BK
obrok/BT
privezati/BP
razkazati/BP
směti/BS
thor/BK
vyrok/BT
prědstoječi/BW
tokar/BK
potok/BT
navyk/BT
razvezati/BP
blagovolěti/BX
vrěti/BX
znahar/BK
prědznak/BT
zvězdar/BK
najdaljši/BW
mlynar/BK
vabik/BT
vratar/BK
šiti/BS
zašiti/BS
prišiti/BS
volěti/BX
vpiti/BS
marsianin/BL
tiskar/BK
pečetar/BK
politi/BS
šalik/BT
izbiti/BS
podgrěti/BS
zahvačajuči/BW
test/BK
almanah/BY
bodnar/BK
borovik/BT
črpak/BT
delfinji/BW
dudar/BK
glavar/BK
gorjanin/BL
gospod/BK
gospodar/BK
govedji/BW
grnčar/BK
hamak/BT
izliti/BS
izplěti/BS
jagnetji/BW
jaz/BK
smrěk/BT
konjar/BK
kozji/BW
kožuhar/BK
kurji/BW
kurnik/BT
lopuh/BY
měsečnik/BT
mlěkar/BK
mravji/BW
nagrěti/BS
naliti/BS
napiti/BS
narězati/BP
našiti/BS
natrpěti/BX
naušnik/BT
naviti/BS
nizati/BP
njuh/BY
obmazati/BP
obozrěti/BX
obriti/BS
obuh/BY
obuti/BS
obviti/BS
opiti/BS
oplěti/BS
ostrovjanin/BL
pčelnik/BT
prstenj/BU
razgrěti/BS
razliti/BS
razmazati/BP
razrězati/BP
razuti/BS
rydži/BW
tlěti/BS
upyr/BK
vděti/BS
velěti/BX
veterinar/BK
vrěsk/BT
vyti/BS
plěti/BS
ovčar/BK
pomazati/BP
namazati/BP
steklnik/BT
pytalnik/BT
razprodati/BN
narkotik/BT
niščeči/BW
nanizati/BP
sviti/BS
ryti/BS
izšiti/BS
kiosk/BT
fartuh/BY
udati/BN
svrběti/BX
stoljar/BK
inoplanetjanin/BL
nejestvujuči/BW
posuvnik/BT
hronikar/BK
pridati/BN
intrigujuči/BW
egipčanin/BL
prahososalnik/BT
smyček/BT
pribiti/BS
odvezati/BP
deprimujuči/BW
smetnik/BT
smetjar/BK
šuměti/BX
jak/BT
odliti/BS
